California statutes. Education Code
(b) By January 1, 2003, the entity with which the department contracts shall submit the standards to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for approval after which the superintendent shall submit the standards to the State Board of Education for approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44471.

The entity with which the State Department of Education contracts shall convene a committee of experts in teacher development, professional development, and instructional leadership to develop the standards and disseminate them for field review. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine the members of the committee of experts and shall include one representative from the University of California and one representative from the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44472.

The standards developed pursuant to this article shall meet all of the following characteristics:

(a) Describe core concepts of high quality professional development and differentiate, where necessary or appropriate, program qualities for high need schools.

(b) Support respect for individual experience and adult learning theory.

(c) Integrate the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 60605 and instructional guides.

(d) Incorporate the California Standards for the Teaching Profession adopted by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing in January 1997.

(e) Provide equitable and timely access to professional development for all educators.

(f) Require program models and designs that include evidence based assessment of outcomes for participants.

(g) Utilize the results of evaluation research based on models of organizational learning and increased pupil learning to improve programs.

(h) Describe the core skills and competencies of coaches, mentors, support providers, university supervisors, and consulting teachers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Student Support and Professional Development Block Grant [44475. - 44475.]

44475.

(a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of four billion four hundred million one hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($4,400,163,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the Student Support and Professional Development Discretionary Block Grant, established pursuant to Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025, for allocation to county offices of education, school districts, charter schools, and the state special schools for discretionary purposes, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing standards-aligned professional development for teachers on the English Language Arts/English Language Development Framework and the Literacy Roadmap, including strategies to support literacy for English learners, and effective
 language acquisition programs for English learners, which may include integrated language development within and across content areas, and building and strengthening capacity to increase bilingual and biliterate proficiency.

(2) Providing standards-aligned professional development for teachers on the Mathematics Framework for California Public Schools.

(3) Providing professional development for certificated and classified educators of transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, and elementary schoolsite administrators on the principles and guidelines of developmentally appropriate instruction, including developmentally appropriate behaviors and behavior interventions, and developmentally appropriate transitional kindergarten pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48000 of the Education Code, to improve the implementation of transitional kindergarten.

(4) Developing and expanding teacher recruitment and retention strategies, including, but not limited to, coaching and mentoring of staff serving in an instructional setting, and beginning teacher or administrator induction.

(5) Expanding career pathways and dual enrollment efforts, consistent with the Master Plan for Career Education.

(6) Community school and promising neighborhood partnerships pursuant to the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(7) Deferred maintenance of school facilities.

(8) Addressing rising costs.

(b) The department
 shall allocate funds proportionally to county offices of education, school districts, charter schools, and the state special schools on the basis of an equal amount per unit of average daily attendance for transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as those numbers were reported as of the second principal apportionment for the 2025–26 fiscal year. The average daily attendance for each state special school shall be deemed to be 97 percent of the enrollment as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System as of the 2025–26 Fall 1 Submission.

(c) (1) Funding appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for expenditure through June 30, 2032. County offices of education, school districts, charter schools, and the state special schools are encouraged, but not required, to use funds received pursuant to this section for the purposes described in paragraphs (1) to
 (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a). On or before September 30, 2032, each county office of education, school district, charter school, and state special school receiving an allocation pursuant to this section shall report final expenditures to the department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds on or before January 31, 2033.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a charter school ceases to operate before June 30, 2032, a final expenditure report shall be due to the department within 60 days of the effective date of closure and the department shall collect any unexpended funds allocated to the charter school.

(d) As a condition of receiving funds apportioned pursuant to this section, a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school shall do all of the following, as applicable:

(1) A school district or charter school with declining enrollment or projected declining enrollment in the next five years shall hold a public hearing, in conjunction with a public hearing on the local control and accountability plan required by Section 47606.5 or 52062, as applicable,
 on their plans to address the declining enrollment’s impacts on the local educational agency, including, but not limited to, attracting and retaining pupils, strengthening course offerings, new program opportunities, class size reduction, facilities management, including potential schoolsite consolidations and closures, and local revenue options.

(2) Ensure that none of their employees are charged a fee for professional services, including, but not limited to, beginning teacher induction program costs and professional development costs, during the grant period pursuant to this section.

(e) Allocations made pursuant to subdivision (b)
 shall first satisfy any outstanding claims pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII   B of the California Constitution for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs for any fiscal year. Notwithstanding Section 12419.5 of the Government Code and any amounts that are paid in satisfaction of outstanding claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs, the Controller may audit any claim as allowed by law, and may recover any amount owed by school districts pursuant to an audit only by reducing amounts owed by the state to school districts for any other mandate claims. Under no circumstances shall a school district be required to remit funding back to the state to pay for disallowed costs identified by a Controller audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs. The Controller shall not recover any amount owed by a school district pursuant to an audit of claimed reimbursable state-mandated local program costs by reducing any amount owed a school district for any purpose
 other than amounts owed for any other mandate claims. The Controller shall apply amounts received by each school district against any balances of unpaid claims for reimbursement of state-mandated local program costs and interest in chronological order beginning with the earliest claim. The Controller shall report to each school district the amounts of any claims and interest that are offset from funds provided pursuant to this section, and shall report a summary of the amounts offset for each mandate for each fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(f) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a), three hundred eighty-three million eight hundred twenty thousand dollars ($383,820,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated
 for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a), two billion four hundred thirty million eight hundred forty-eight thousand dollars ($2,430,848,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated
 pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(3) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a), one billion five hundred eighty-five million four hundred ninety-five thousand dollars ($1,585,495,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 17.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers [44500. - 44508.]

44500.

(a) There is hereby established the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers. The governing board of a school district and the exclusive representative of the certificated employees in the school district may develop and implement a program authorized by this article that meets local conditions and conforms with the principles set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) The following principles, at a minimum, shall be included in a locally developed program authorized by this article:

(1) A teacher participant shall be a permanent employee in a school district with 250 or greater units of average daily attendance or a permanent or probationary employee in a school district with fewer than 250 units of average daily attendance and volunteer to participate in the program or be referred for participation in the program as a result of an evaluation performed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44664. In addition, teachers receiving assistance may be referred pursuant to a collectively bargained agreement.

(2) Performance goals for an individual teacher shall be in writing, clearly stated, aligned with pupil learning, and consistent with Section 44662.

(3) Assistance and review shall include multiple observations of a teacher during periods of classroom instruction.

(4) The program shall expect and strongly encourage a cooperative relationship between the consulting teacher and the principal with respect to the process of peer assistance and review.

(5) The school district shall provide sufficient staff development activities to assist a teacher to improve his or her teaching skills and knowledge.

(6) The program shall have a monitoring component with a written record.

(7) The final evaluation of a teacher’s participation in the program shall be made available for placement in the personnel file of the teacher receiving assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 566, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44501.

A consulting teacher participating in a program operated pursuant to this article shall meet locally determined criteria and each of the following qualifications:

(a) The consulting teacher shall be a credentialed classroom teacher with permanent status or, in a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils, a credentialed classroom teacher who has completed at least three consecutive school years as an employee of the school district in a position requiring certification qualifications.

(b) The consulting teacher shall have substantial recent experience in classroom instruction.

(c) The consulting teacher shall have demonstrated exemplary teaching ability, as indicated by, among other things, effective communication skills, subject matter knowledge, and mastery of a range of teaching strategies necessary to meet the needs of pupils in different contexts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44502.

(a) The governance structure of a program designed pursuant to this article shall include a joint teacher administrator peer review panel that shall select consulting teachers, review peer review reports prepared by consulting teachers, and make recommendations to the governing board of a school district regarding participants in the program, including forwarding to the governing board the names of individuals who, after sustained assistance, are not able to demonstrate satisfactory improvement.

(b) The majority of the panel shall be composed of certificated classroom teachers chosen to serve on the panel by other certificated classroom teachers. The remainder of the panel shall be composed of school administrators chosen to serve on the panel by the school district.

(c) The panel’s procedures for selecting consulting teachers, at a minimum, shall require the following:

(1) Consulting teachers shall be selected by the majority vote of the panel.

(2) The selection process shall include provisions for classroom observation of the candidates for consulting teacher by the panel.

(d) The panel shall also annually evaluate the impact of the district’s peer assistance and review program in order to improve the program. This evaluation may include, but is not limited to, interviews or surveys of the program participants. The panel may submit recommendations for improvement of the program to the governing board of the school district and to the exclusive representative of the certificated employees in the school district, if the certificated employees in the district are represented by an exclusive representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44503.

(a) The governing board of a school district that accepts state funds for purposes of this article agrees to negotiate the development and implementation of the program with the exclusive representative of the certificated employees in the school district, if the certificated employees in the district are represented by an exclusive representative. In a school district in which the certificated employees are not represented, the school district shall develop a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers consistent with this article in order to be eligible to receive funding under this article.

(b) Functions performed pursuant to this article by certificated employees employed in a bargaining unit position shall not constitute either management or supervisory functions as defined by subdivisions (g) and (m) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.

(c) Teachers who provide assistance and review shall have the same protection from liability and access to appropriate defense as other public school employees pursuant to Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts be allowed to combine, by mutual agreement, their programs of peer assistance and review with those of other school districts.

(e) Not more than 5 percent of the funds received by a school district for the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers may be expended for administrative expenses. For the purposes of this article, administrative expenses shall include expenditures for the personnel costs of program administration and coordination, the cost of consulting teacher selection, and indirect costs associated with the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 26.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44504.

(a) Except as provided in Section 44505, the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers shall become fully operational on July 1, 2001, on which date it shall completely replace the California Mentor Teacher Program established pursuant to Chapter 1302 of the Statutes of 1983 and set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 44490). This article is applicable to all school districts that elect to receive state funds for the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers. Commencing with the 2001–02 fiscal year, funding shall only be made available for purposes authorized by this article. A school district that elects to participate in the program established pursuant to this article shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction by August 1, 2001, that it has implemented a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to this article.

(b) A school district that does not elect to participate in the program authorized under this article by July 1, 2001, is not eligible for any apportionment, allocation, or other funding from an appropriation for the program authorized pursuant to this article or for any apportionments, allocations, or other funding from funding for local assistance appropriated pursuant to Budget Act Item 6110-231-0001, funding appropriated for the Administrator Training and Evaluation Program set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 44681) of Chapter 3.1 of Part 25, from an appropriation for the Instructional Time and Staff Development Reform Program as set forth in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44579) of Chapter 3, or from an appropriation for school development plans as set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 44670.1) of Chapter 3.1 and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall not apportion, allocate, or otherwise provide any funds to the district pursuant to those programs.

(c) Commencing February 1, 2002, a school district that elects not to participate in the program authorized under this article shall report annually at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district on the rationale for not participating in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 20.3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44505.

(a) Between July 1, 1999, and June 30, 2000, a school district may notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it plans to implement, commencing July 1, 2000, a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to this article. Upon receipt of the notification by the school district, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion to the school district two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800) or an amount equal to the number of mentor teachers that the state calculated the school district is entitled to in the 1999–2000 fiscal year pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 44490) multiplied by two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800), whichever is greater.

(b) A school district that notifies the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it plans to implement a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers by July 1, 2000, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it has implemented a program by August 1, 2000. In addition to the certification, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may request a copy of the signature page of the collective bargaining agreement implementing the program required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44503. A school district that fails to provide the required certification is not eligible to receive an apportionment for the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section or subdivision (a) of Section 44498 in the 2000–01 school year, or in any year thereafter. The school district, however, may be eligible to receive an apportionment for the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section and subdivision (a) of Section 44498 in the 2000–01 school year, and in each year thereafter, if the school district complies with the requirements set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(c) Between July 1, 2000, and May 31, 2001, a school district may notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it plans to implement, commencing July 1, 2001, a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to this article. On or before June 29, 2001, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion to every school district that provides this notification an amount equal to the number of mentor teachers that the state calculated the school district is entitled to in the 1999–2000 school year pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 44490) times a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any school district that provides this notification shall receive at least the amount that would be received pursuant to this section by a school district with one state funded mentor in the 2000–01 school year pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 44490).

(d) A school district that notifies the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it plans to implement a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers by July 1, 2001, pursuant to subdivision (c), shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it has implemented a program by July 1, 2001. In addition to the certification, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may request a copy of the signature page of the collective bargaining agreement implementing the program required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44503. A school district that fails to provide the required certification is not eligible for any apportionment for the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers received pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section, and subdivision (a) of Section 44498 in the 2001–02 school year, or in any year thereafter.

(e) The funding provided pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of this section and subdivision (a) of Section 44498 shall be provided to eligible school districts in each year that the school operates a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers.

(f) The maximum amount of funds available for apportionment to school districts by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6 of the act adding this section, minus any funds apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts pursuant to subdivision (a) as of June 30, 2000.

(g) A school district may use funds apportioned pursuant to this section for activities necessary to implement the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44506.

(a) The state funding for this article subsequent to the 1999–2000 fiscal year is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(b) A school district that receives funds for purposes of this article also may expend those funds for any of the following purposes:

(1) The Marian Bergeson Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System as set forth in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.1) of Chapter 2.

(2) A district intern program as set forth in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) of Chapter 2.

(3) Professional development or other educational activities previously provided pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 44490) of Chapter 3, as it read prior to January 1, 2002.

(4) A program that supports the training and development of new teachers.

(c) (1) The Superintendent shall determine a base funding unit rate for the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers that is equal to the total amount provided for the California Mentor Teacher Program in subdivision (b) of Section 6 of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 1999 for the First Extraordinary Session, divided by the total number of mentor teachers that the state calculated the school district is entitled to in the 1999–2000 fiscal year.

(2) The Superintendent annually shall apportion to each school district that certified implementation of the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44505, an amount equal to 5 percent of the prior year count of certificated classroom teachers employed by the school district, multiplied by a rate that equals the sum of (i) the base amount per funding unit as calculated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), adjusted annually pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1, and (ii) two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800); adjusted annually pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1.

(3) The Superintendent annually shall apportion to each school district that certified implementation of a Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44505, an amount equal to 5 percent of the prior year count of certificated classroom teachers employed by the school district, multiplied by a rate which equals the sum of (i) the base amount per funding unit as calculated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), adjusted annually pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1, and (ii) the per mentor teacher unit amount provided to the district pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44505, adjusted annually pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1.

(4) In paragraphs (2) and (3), 5 percent of the certificated classroom teachers employed by the district shall be rounded to the next whole integer.

(5) If at the end of a fiscal year, an amount of funds available for purposes of the Peer Assistance and Review Program remain unallocated, the Superintendent shall use the unallocated amount to increase the base funding rate calculated under paragraph (1) for the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44507.

Subject to the availability of funding in the annual Budget Act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall contract with an independent evaluator on or before December 15, 2002, to prepare a comprehensive evaluation of the implementation, impact, cost, and benefit of the California Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers. The evaluation shall be delivered to the Legislature, the Governor, and interested parties on or before January 1, 2004. As a condition of receiving funding, school districts implementing programs pursuant to this article shall provide data, as requested by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, to provide baseline information for the evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 20.6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44508.

For purposes of this article, “school district” includes a county office of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Exchange and Recruitment [44610. - 44617.]

44610.

This article shall be known as the “World Language Teacher Exchange and Recruitment Law of 1963.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 9.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44611.

The purposes of this article are to encourage and promote the temporary exchange of teachers between school districts in California and schools in foreign countries and to make available to California schools as teachers foreign-born persons and others who are especially qualified to provide instruction in one or more modern world languages in order that the schools of this state may comply with the requirement of the state law that world language instruction be given to pupils in grades 6, 7, and 8 as of July 1, 1965. It is the finding of the Legislature that California teachers will become more fluent in a world language and more knowledgeable about peoples of other countries and their environment by teaching service in a country where that language is used in daily life, and that it will be of substantial
 benefit to California pupils beginning the study of a world language to be instructed by teachers who are fluent in the language and conversant with the attendant culture and are therefore able to instill and reinforce the appropriate speech habits early in the learning experience of the pupil. It is the purpose of the Legislature to encourage and enable California schools to benefit from the language abilities of citizens of foreign countries who are now or in the future may be residents of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 10.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44612.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations under which teachers employed by California school districts may exchange positions with teachers in schools in other countries for a period of one year or less. The arrangements for such exchanges shall be made through the Department of Education and in cooperation with the teacher exchange programs administered by agencies of the federal government. The first such exchanges shall take place during the 1964–1965 school year.

Grants from the federal government or any department or agency thereof may be accepted by the state and its agencies to be expended pursuant to the programs and plans enumerated in this article. The Department of Education shall administer the teacher exchange program provided for in this article and shall do all acts necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44613.

Teachers employed by California school districts desiring to participate in an exchange of positions under this article shall file with the Department of Education an application setting forth a plan of study to be completed during the year of service in a foreign country and shall agree to teach in a California school district for a minimum of two years following the year of exchange service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44614.

(a) The exchange of teachers with a foreign country pursuant to this article shall be conditioned upon the fact that the employing school district in California shall not be required to pay the salary of the teacher from the foreign country. Teachers employed by California school districts shall, while serving as teachers in a foreign country pursuant to this article, continue to receive from their employing school districts the full amounts of the regular salaries that would be payable to them if they were serving in the schools of the particular employing school districts, and the school district shall make all deductions provided by law for retirement purposes during that period.

(b) The department may pay to the teachers
 from a foreign country employed by a school district in California pursuant to this article, part or all of the difference between the salary being paid to them by their respective foreign employers and the salary being paid by the California school district to the particular teachers with whom they are exchanged, as the department shall determine to be appropriate in each instance, except that no payment for these purposes to a foreign teacher shall exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) in one school year, nor shall payments for these purposes be made to more than 500 teachers from foreign countries in any one fiscal year.

(c) The department may pay the travel expenses of teachers in the exchange program but those payments shall not be made to more than 500 California teachers and 500 teachers from foreign countries in any one fiscal year, and those payments shall be for the actual expense involved in travel to and from the exchange
 assignments or for one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is the lesser amount.

(d) The commission shall establish minimum standards for credentials for exchange teachers from a foreign country and shall provide for the issuance of credentials to those teachers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 22.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44615.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations providing for the recruitment of, and issuance of special credentials in the teaching of a world language to, foreign-born persons or others having native fluency in a modern world language to teach world languages in the public schools of California. The issuance of special credentials in the teaching of world languages pursuant to this section shall be limited to 500 persons a year. The commission shall prescribe the minimum standards for these special credentials and shall provide for the renewal of these credentials. In issuing the credentials to any applicant, the commission shall take into consideration fluency in the language to be taught, academic preparation, previous teaching experience, a knowledge of modern methods of world language instruction, and a knowledge of peoples of other countries
 and their environment. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations that require the holder of a special credential issued under this section to undertake, within a reasonable time, a course of study that will enable the holder to become eligible for a standard teaching credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 55.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44616.

(a) The department may contract with universities and colleges in this state approved by the commission as a teacher education institution for furnishing refresher courses in which applicants for a special credential in the teaching of a world language issued under Section 44615 who have not had previous recent teaching experience may secure instruction in the teaching of a world language that will enable them to meet the standards prescribed by the commission.

(b) Instruction in the teaching of world languages pursuant to this section shall be limited to 500 persons a year.

(c) The department may pay to each person enrolled in a refresher course a stipend of
 seventy-five dollars ($75) a week for a total of six weeks or a stipend paid in some other manner but the total amount paid to an individual shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 12.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44617.

Section 44854 applies to exchange teachers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. In-Service Training:  Anabolic Steroids [44645. - 44645.]

44645.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of anabolic steroids to expedite the physical development and enhance the performance level of secondary school athletes presents a serious health hazard to these pupil athletes.

Therefore it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage county offices of education and school districts that offer in-service training to credentialed staff who provide health education, physical education, or science education to pupils to include, where appropriate, within the in-service training for any one of those subjects new developments in the scientific understanding of anabolic steroids as well as new education techniques directed at preventing the use of anabolic steroids.

(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) Participation in the training be voluntary on the part of the credentialed staff.

(2) To the extent possible, training be provided to a team of educators.

(3) The training be provided by persons with expertise on the effects of anabolic steroids.

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that State Department of Education develop guidelines for the provision of in-service training relating to the use of anabolic steroids. In developing and providing the in-service training, county offices of education and school districts are encouraged to cooperate and collaborate with the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Evaluation and Assessment of Performance of Certificated Employees [44660. - 44665.]

44660.

It is the intent of the Legislature that governing boards establish a uniform system of evaluation and assessment of the performance of all certificated personnel within each school district of the state, including schools conducted or maintained by county superintendents of education. The system shall involve the development and adoption by each school district of objective evaluation and assessment guidelines which may, at the discretion of the governing board, be uniform throughout the district or, for compelling reasons, be individually developed for territories or schools within the district, provided that all certificated personnel of the district shall be subject to a system of evaluation and assessment adopted pursuant to this article.

This article does not apply to certificated personnel who are employed on an hourly basis in adult education classes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44661.
